District of Columbia statutes.
2-1411.06

Abolishment of the Department of Human Rights and Local Business Development.

Pursuant to § 1-204.04(b), the Council hereby abolishes the Department of Human Rights and Local Business Development, established under Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1989, effective November 1, 1989. The Department of Human Rights and Local Business Development is abolished as of October 1, 1999.

Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 207, 46 DCR 6373
For temporary (90-day) addition of subchapter IV, see notes following § 2-1411.01.